pt-PT: Perfil de sabor: Caramelos; Maltado; Fruto seco; Torrado; Outro
el: Προφίλ γεύσης: Καραμέλα; Βύνης; Ξηρών καρπών; Ψητού; Άλλο
en: Flavor profile: Caramel; Malty; Nutty; Roasty; Other
tr: Lezzet Profili: Karamel; Malt; Fındıklı; Kızarmış; Diğer
cs: Chuťový profil: Karamelový; Sladový; Ořechový; Pražený; Jiné
ko: 맛 프로필: 캐러멜; 몰티; 너티; 로스티; 기타
es: Perfil de sabor: Caramelo; Malteado; Con nueces; Tostado; Otros
nl: Smaakprofiel: Karamel; Moutig; Nootachtig; Gebrand; Andere
bg-BG: Вкусов профил: Карамел; Малцов; Ядков; Печен; Други
ja: フレーバープロフィール: キャラメル; モルティ; ナッティ; ロースティ; その他
zh-TW: 風味概況: 焦糖; 麥芽; 堅果; 烘焙; 其他
da: Smagsprofil: Karamel; Maltet; Nøddeagtig; Ristet; Andet
ru: Вкусоароматические характеристики: Карамель; Солодовый; Ореховый; Жареный; Другой
pl: Profil aromatu: Karmel; Słód; Orzechowy; Pieczeń; Inne
pt-BR: Perfil de sabor: Caramelo; Maltado; De nozes; Assado; Outro
zh-CN: 口味: 焦糖; 麦芽味; 坚果味; 烤肉味; 其他
hr-HR: Profil okusa: Karamel; Poput slada; Orašasti; Zapečeni; Ostalo
ro-RO: Profil gustativ: Caramel; Cu gust de malț; Cu gust de nuci; Prăjit; Altele
sv: Smakprofil: Kola; Maltig; Nötig; Rostad; Övrigt
vi: Mô tả hương vị: Caramel; Mạch nha; Quả hạch; Rang; Khác
lt-LT: Skonio profilis: Karamelė; Salyklo; Riešutų; Skrudintas; Kita
th: โปรไฟล์รสชาติ: รสคาราเมล; รสมอลต์; รสถั่ว; หอมกลิ่นคั่ว; อื่นๆ
hu: Ízesítési profil: Karamell; Malátás; Diós; Pörkölt; Egyéb
sl-SI: Profil okusa: Karamela; Sladni; Oreškast; Pražen; Drugo
fr: Profil de saveur: Caramel; Malté; Noisette; Rôti; Autre
nb: Smaksprofil: Karamell; Maltet; Nøttete; Brent; Annet
de: Geschmacksprofil: Karamell; Malzig; Nussig; Geröstet; Sonstiges
fi: Makuprofiili: Karamelli; Maltainen; Pähkinäinen; Paahdettu; Muu
sk-SK: Chuťový profil: Karamel; Sladový; Orieškový; Pražený; Iné
it: Profilo aromatico: Caramello; Al malto; Alle noci; Tostato; Altro